District of Columbia statutes.
22-1513

Penalty under § 22-1511.

Any person, firm, or association violating any of the provisions of § 22-1511 shall upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment of not more than 60 days, or by both fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. A corporation convicted of an offense under the provisions of § 22-1511 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, and its president or such other officials as may be responsible for the conduct and management thereof shall be imprisoned not more than 60 days, in the discretion of the court.

May 29, 1916, 39 Stat. 165, ch. 130, § 3
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 222, 60 DCR 2064
Food sales, misrepresentation or false advertising, purchase authorization, see § 37-201.22a.
1981 Ed., § 22-1413.
1973 Ed., § 22-1413.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500” twice.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 222 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.